Illinois, session 104th, HB10.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Foster Children's Bill of Rights Act is 5amended by changing Section 5 and by adding Section 15 as 6follows: 7    (20 ILCS 521/5)8    Sec. 5. Foster Children's Bill of Rights. It is the policy 9of this State that every child and adult in the care of the 10Department of Children and Family Services who is placed in 11foster care shall have the following rights:12        (1) To live in a safe, healthy, and comfortable home 13    where they are treated with respect.14        (2) To be free from physical, sexual, emotional, or 15    other abuse, or corporal punishment.16        (3) To receive adequate and healthy food, adequate 17    clothing, and, for youth in group homes, residential 18    treatment facilities, and foster homes, an allowance.19        (4) To receive medical, dental, vision, and mental 20    health services.21        (5) To be free of the administration of medication or 22    chemical substances, unless authorized by a physician.23        (6) To contact family members, unless prohibited by   HB0010- 2 -LRB104 03031 KTG 13049 b1    court order, and social workers, attorneys, foster youth 2    advocates and supporters, Court Appointed Special 3    Advocates (CASAs), and probation officers.4        (7) To visit and contact siblings, unless prohibited 5    by court order.6        (8) To contact the Advocacy Office for Children and 7    Families established under the Children and Family 8    Services Act or the Department of Children and Family 9    Services' Office of the Inspector General regarding 10    violations of rights, to speak to representatives of these 11    offices confidentially, and to be free from threats or 12    punishment for making complaints.13        (9) To make and receive confidential telephone calls 14    and send and receive unopened mail, unless prohibited by 15    court order. 16        (10) To attend religious services and activities of 17    their choice. 18        (11) To maintain an emancipation bank account and 19    manage personal income, consistent with the child's age 20    and developmental level, unless prohibited by the case 21    plan.22        (12) To not be locked in a room, building, or facility 23    premises, unless placed in a secure child care facility 24    licensed by the Department of Children and Family Services 25    under the Child Care Act of 1969 and placed pursuant to 26    Section 2-27.1 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.  HB0010- 3 -LRB104 03031 KTG 13049 b1        (13) To attend school and participate in 2    extracurricular, cultural, and personal enrichment 3    activities, consistent with the child's age and 4    developmental level, with minimal disruptions to school 5    attendance and educational stability.6        (14) To work and develop job skills at an 7    age-appropriate level, consistent with State law.8        (15) To have social contacts with people outside of 9    the foster care system, including teachers, church 10    members, mentors, and friends.11        (16) If they meet age requirements, to attend services 12    and programs operated by the Department of Children and 13    Family Services or any other appropriate State agency that 14    aim to help current and former foster youth achieve 15    self-sufficiency prior to and after leaving foster care.16        (17) To attend court hearings and speak to the judge.17        (18) To have storage space for private use.18        (19) To be involved in the development of their own 19    case plan and plan for permanent placement.20        (20) To review their own case plan and plan for 21    permanent placement, if they are 12 years of age or older 22    and in a permanent placement, and to receive information 23    about their out-of-home placement and case plan, including 24    being told of changes to the case plan.25        (21) To be free from unreasonable searches of personal 26    belongings.  HB0010- 4 -LRB104 03031 KTG 13049 b1        (22) To the confidentiality of all juvenile court 2    records consistent with existing law.3        (23) To have fair and equal access to all available 4    services, placement, care, treatment, and benefits, and to 5    not be subjected to discrimination or harassment on the 6    basis of actual or perceived race, ethnic group 7    identification, ancestry, national origin, color, 8    religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, mental 9    or physical disability, or HIV status.10        (24) To have caregivers and child welfare personnel 11    who have received sensitivity training and instruction on 12    matters concerning race, ethnicity, national origin, 13    color, ancestry, religion, mental and physical disability, 14    and HIV status.15        (25) To have caregivers and child welfare personnel 16    who have received instruction on cultural competency and 17    sensitivity relating to, and best practices for, providing 18    adequate care to lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender 19    youth in out-of-home care.20        (26) At 16 years of age or older, to have access to 21    existing information regarding the educational options 22    available, including, but not limited to, the coursework 23    necessary for vocational and postsecondary educational 24    programs, and information regarding financial aid for 25    postsecondary education.26        (27) To have access to age-appropriate, medically   HB0010- 5 -LRB104 03031 KTG 13049 b1    accurate information about reproductive health care, the 2    prevention of unplanned pregnancy, and the prevention and 3    treatment of sexually transmitted infections at 12 years 4    of age or older. 5        (28) To receive a copy of this Act from and have it 6    fully explained by the Department of Children and Family 7    Services when the child or adult is placed in the care of 8    the Department of Children and Family Services.9        (29) To be placed in the least restrictive and most 10    family-like setting available and in close proximity to 11    their parent's home consistent with their health, safety, 12    best interests, and special needs. 13        (30) To participate in an age and developmentally 14    appropriate intake process immediately after placement in 15    the custody or guardianship of the Department. During the 16    intake process, the Department shall provide the youth 17    with a document describing inappropriate acts of 18    affection, discipline, and punishment by guardians, foster 19    parents, foster siblings, or any other adult responsible 20    for the youth's welfare. During the intake process, the 21    Department shall also provide the youth with luggage 22    suitable to transport the youth's personal belongings. The 23    Department shall review and discuss the document with the 24    youth child. The Department must document completion of 25    the intake process in the youth's child's records as well 26    as giving a copy of the document to the youth child.   HB0010- 6 -LRB104 03031 KTG 13049 b1        (31) To participate in appropriate intervention and 2    counseling services after removal from the home of origin 3    in order to assess whether the youth is exhibiting signs 4    of traumatic stress, special needs, or mental illness. 5        (32) To receive a home visit by an assigned child 6    welfare specialist, per existing Department policies and 7    procedures, on a monthly basis or more frequently as 8    needed. In addition to what existing policies and 9    procedures outline, home visits shall be used to assess 10    the youth's well-being and emotional health following 11    placement, to determine the youth's relationship with the 12    youth's guardian or foster parent or with any other adult 13    responsible for the youth's welfare or living in or 14    frequenting the home environment, and to determine what 15    forms of discipline, if any, the youth's guardian or 16    foster parent or any other person in the home environment 17    uses to correct the youth. 18        (33) To be enrolled in an independent living services 19    program prior to transitioning out of foster care where 20    the youth will receive classes and instruction, 21    appropriate to the youth's age and developmental capacity, 22    on independent living and self-sufficiency in the areas of 23    employment, finances, meals, and housing as well as help 24    in developing life skills and long-term goals. 25        (34) To be assessed by a third-party entity or agency 26    prior to enrollment in any independent living services   HB0010- 7 -LRB104 03031 KTG 13049 b1    program in order to determine the youth's readiness for a 2    transition out of foster care based on the youth's 3    individual needs, emotional development, and ability, 4    regardless of age, to make a successful transition to 5    adulthood. 6        (35) To hair care haircare that preserves the child's 7    desired connection to the child's race, culture, gender, 8    religion, and identity and to have a corresponding hair 9    care haircare plan established in accordance with Section 10    7.3b of the Children and Family Services Act. The 11    Department must provide, in a timely and consistent 12    manner, training for all caregivers and child welfare 13    personnel on how to meet the hair care haircare needs of 14    children. 15(Source: P.A. 102-810, eff. 1-1-23; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 16103-850, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-21-24.) 17    (20 ILCS 521/15 new)18    Sec. 15. Luggage.19    (a) In this Section, "luggage" means a suitcase, duffel 20bag, backpack, or similar container designed to hold an 21individual's personal belongings.22    (b) The Department shall:23        (1) establish and maintain a decentralized supply of 24    luggage to be used to transport the belongings of any 25    child in the foster care system; and  HB0010- 8 -LRB104 03031 KTG 13049 b1        (2) develop procedures for the storage and 2    distribution of luggage.3    (c) The Department shall provide luggage to a child who is 4being removed from home or changing placement. Luggage 5provided under this subsection belongs to the child it is 6provided to and may not be reclaimed by the Department or 7retained by the foster parent. The Department is not required 8to provide new luggage under this subsection to a child who is 9changing placement and has the luggage previously provided by 10the Department.11    (d) The Department shall, subject to appropriation, 12purchase luggage that cannot otherwise be provided through 13grant or donation to ensure a sufficient supply of luggage to 14comply with subsections (b) and (c). Luggage so purchased 15shall be purchased at a retail price of no greater than $150 16per bag.17    (e) The Department shall maintain a record of each time a 18trash bag is used to move a foster child's personal 19belongings. The record must include the reason the Department 20did not provide the child with appropriate luggage to move the 21child's personal belongings.22    (f) The Department shall submit an annual report to the 23Governor and the General Assembly that includes a summary of:24        (1) the number of times a trash bag was used to 25    transport a foster child's personal belongings and the 26    reasons the Department failed to provide the child with   HB0010- 9 -LRB104 03031 KTG 13049 b1    appropriate luggage; and2        (2) the Department's supply inventory and inventory 3    management practices for the luggage supply maintained 4    under subsection (b).5    (g) This subsection and subsection (f) are repealed on 6January 1, 2028.